Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Lotteries

§ 2101.
Setting up, promoting, or aiding.

Except as provided in section 2143 of this title, a person who sets up or promotes a lottery for money or other property, or disposes of money or property by a lottery, and a person aiding or concerned in so doing, or who knowingly allows premises owned or occupied by him or her or under his or her control to be used for that purpose, or by persons raffling or using a game of chance for money or property, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, for the first offense and imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Amended 1993, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2102.
Disposing of property by way of chance.

Except as provided in section 2143 of this title, a person who sells or disposes of property by way of chance or, as an inducement to the sale of property, gives the purchaser or any other person other property to be drawn by way of chance or lottery shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, for the first offense and imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Amended 1993, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 2102a.
Affirmative defense.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under section 2101 or 2102 of this title that the person charged complied with the provisions of section 2143 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2103.
Lottery tickets.

A person shall not:

sell a lottery ticket or an interest therein, or a paper purporting to be a lottery ticket or an interest therein;

open or keep an office, shop, or store for the purpose of selling or procuring a lottery ticket or paper or an interest therein;

act as a broker or agent in buying, selling, or procuring to be bought or sold or disposed of in any way such ticket or interest therein, or in effecting or in endeavoring to effect a contract in regard thereto;

set up, exhibit, or publish or cause to be set up, exhibited, or published within this state written, printed, or electronically communicated proposals to buy, sell, or procure such ticket or interest therein.

A person violating a provision hereof shall be fined not more than $300.00.

For purposes of this section, no internet service provider or provider of internet transport facilities shall be liable solely as a result of use of its facilities by a third party for a prohibited use without the provider’s actual knowledge or express consent.

HISTORY:

Amended 1999, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.